Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-38,106
Certification of trust; use; effect.

A person's failure to demand a certification of trust, or his or her refusal to accept and rely solely on a certification of trust, shall not be considered an improper act, and no inference as to whether he or she has acted in good faith shall be drawn from the failure to demand, or the refusal to accept and rely upon, a certification of trust. This section creates no implication that a person is liable for acting in reliance upon a certification of trust under circumstances in which the requirements of sections 30-38,102 to 30-38,107 are not satisfied.

Laws 2000, LB 1197, § 5;

R.S.Supp.,2002, § 30-3705;

Laws 2003, LB 130, § 106.